California, session 20252026, AB1970.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 1367.202 is added to the Health and Safety Code, to read:1367.202. (a) (1) Notwithstanding any other law, a health care service plan contract that is issued, amended, or renewed on or after January 1, 2027, shall not impose step therapy as a prerequisite to authorizing coverage of any prescription drug used for the treatment of a serious mental illness or substance use disorder. disorder, except as provided in paragraph (2).(2) If there is more than one therapeutic or clinical equivalent approved by the United States Food and Drug Administration, this section does not require a health care service plan to cover all therapeutic or clinical equivalents without step therapy if at least one therapeutic or clinical equivalent is available without step therapy.(b) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:(1) “Serious mental illness” has the same meaning as “serious mental disorder” as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 5600.3 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.(2) “Step therapy” means the same as defined in Section 10123.201 of the Insurance Code.(3) “Substance use disorder” means a substance-related and addictive disorder, as defined in the most recent edition of the Diagnostic and Statistical Manual of Mental Disorders.(c) This section shall apply to Medi-Cal managed care plan contracts only to the extent that the State Department of Health Care Services obtains any necessary federal approvals, and federal financial participation under the Medi-Cal program is available and not otherwise jeopardized.(d) This section does not require or authorize a health care service plan that contracts with the State Department of Health Care Services to provide services to Medi-Cal beneficiaries to provide coverage for prescription drugs that are not required pursuant to those programs or contracts, or to limit or exclude any prescription drugs that are required by those programs or contracts.(e) For purposes of this section, the prohibition on step therapy shall not apply when the United States Food and Drug Administration-labeled indications and usage of a drug indicate that some prior medication must be taken.(f) This section does not apply to a specialized health care service plan contract that covers only dental or vision benefits or a Medicare supplement contract.SEC. 2. Section 10123.1931 is added to the Insurance Code, to read:10123.1931. (a) (1) Notwithstanding any other law, a health insurance policy that is issued, amended, or renewed on or after January 1, 2027, shall not impose step therapy as a prerequisite to authorizing coverage of any prescription drug used for the treatment of a serious mental illness or substance use disorder. disorder, except as provided in paragraph (2).(2) If there is more than one therapeutic or clinical equivalent approved by the United States Food and Drug Administration, this section does not require a health insurance policy to cover all therapeutic or clinical equivalents without step therapy if at least one therapeutic or clinical equivalent is available without step therapy.(b) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:(1) “Serious mental illness” has the same meaning as “serious mental disorder” as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 5600.3 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.(2) “Step therapy” means the same as defined in Section 10123.201.(3) “Substance use disorder” means a substance-related and addictive disorder, as defined in the most recent edition of the Diagnostic and Statistical Manual of Mental Disorders.(c) For purposes of this section, the prohibition on step therapy shall not apply when the United States Food and Drug Administration-labeled indications and usage of a drug indicate that some prior medication must be taken.(d) This section does not apply to dental-only or vision-only health insurance, Medicare supplement insurance, or nonhealth disability insurance policies.SEC. 3. No reimbursement is required by this act pursuant to Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution because the only costs that may be incurred by a local agency or school district will be incurred because this act creates a new crime or infraction, eliminates a crime or infraction, or changes the penalty for a crime or infraction, within the meaning of Section 17556 of the Government Code, or changes the definition of a crime within the meaning of Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution.